Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; RED LAKE BAND OF CHIPPEWA INDIANS; WASTEWATER INFRASTRUCTURE.new text end new text begin $3,300,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to the Red Lake Band of Chippewa Indians to construct a wastewater stabilization pond and associated water and sewer line infrastructure for the Little Rock District on the Red Lake Reservation. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end